Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB1115.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 772. As used in this chapter: (a) "Allegation" means an assertion of fact made by an individual that has not yet been proved or supported with evidence. (b) "Appeals committee" means a committee appointed by the director or by the board of a community mental health services program or licensed hospital under section 774. (c) "Appellant" means the recipient, complainant, parent, or guardian who appeals a recipient rights finding or a respondent's action to an appeals committee. (d) "Complainant" means an individual who files a rights complaint. (e) "Investigation" means a detailed inquiry into and systematic examination of an allegation raised in a rights complaint. (f) "Office" means all of the following: (i) With respect to a rights complaint involving services provided directly by or under contract with the department, unless the provider is a community mental health services program, the state office of recipient rights created under section 754. (ii) With respect to a rights complaint involving services provided directly by or under contract with a community mental health services program, the office of recipient rights created by a community mental health services program under section 755. (iii) With respect to a rights complaint involving services provided by a licensed hospital, the office of recipient rights created by a licensed hospital under section 755. (g) "Rights complaint" means a written or oral statement that meets the requirements of section 776. (h) "Respondent" means the service provider that had responsibility at the time of an alleged rights violation for the services with respect to which a rights complaint has been filed. (i) "State psychiatric hospital" means a psychiatric hospital operated by the department. Sec. 776. (1) A recipient, or another individual on behalf of a recipient, may file a rights complaint with the office alleging a violation of this act or rules promulgated under this act. (2) A rights complaint shall must contain all of the following information: (a) A statement of the allegations that give rise to the dispute. (b) A statement of the right or rights that may have been violated. (c) The outcome that the complainant is seeking as a resolution to the complaint. (3) Each The office shall record each rights complaint shall be recorded upon on receipt by the office, and send an acknowledgment of the recording shall be sent along with a copy of the complaint to the complainant within not later than 5 business days after receipt of the rights complaint. (4) Within Not later than 5 business days after the office receives a rights complaint, it the office shall notify the complainant if it the office determines that no investigation of the rights complaint is warranted. (5) The office shall assist the a recipient or other individual with the rights complaint process. The office shall advise the recipient or other individual that there are advocacy organizations available to assist in the preparation of a written rights complaint and shall offer to refer the recipient or other individual to those organizations. In the absence of assistance from an advocacy organization, the office shall assist the recipient or other individual in preparing a written rights complaint. The office shall inform the recipient or other individual of the option of that mediation under section 786.is an option. (6) The office shall maintain at least 1 rights complaint collection site at each unit in a state psychiatric hospital and collect all rights complaints submitted at a collection site at least once per day, including on weekends and holidays. The collection site must accept, but is not limited to accepting, paper-based requests. (7) (6) If a rights complaint has been filed regarding the conduct of the executive director, the rights investigation shall must be conducted by the office of another community mental health services program or by the state office of recipient rights as decided by the board. Sec. 778. (1) The office shall initiate an investigation of an apparent or suspected rights violations violation in a timely and efficient manner. Subject to delays involving pending action by external agencies as described in subsection (5), the office shall complete the investigation not later than 90 days after it receives the submission of a rights complaint. Investigation shall An investigation must be initiated immediately after the submission of a rights complaint in cases involving alleged abuse, neglect, serious injury, or death of a recipient. involving an apparent or suspected rights violation.As used in this subsection, "immediately" means not later than 24 hours. (2) Investigation The office shall accurately record investigation activities for each rights complaint. shall be accurately recorded by the office. (3) The office shall determine whether a right was violated by using the preponderance of the evidence as its standard of proof. (4) The office shall issue a written status report every 30 calendar days during the course of the investigation. The written status report shall must be submitted to the complainant, the respondent, and the responsible mental health agency. A written status report shall must include all of the following: (a) Statement of the allegations. (b) Statement of the issues involved. (c) Citations to relevant provisions of this act, rules, policies, and guidelines. (d) Investigative progress to date. (e) Expected date for completion of the investigation. (5) Upon On completion of the investigation, the office shall submit a written investigative report to the respondent and to the responsible mental health agency. Issuance of the written investigative report may be delayed pending completion of investigations that involve external agencies, including law enforcement agencies and the department of social services. The written investigative report shall must include all of the following: (a) Statement of the allegations. (b) Statement of the issues involved. (c) Citations to relevant provisions of this act, rules, policies, and guidelines. (d) Investigative findings. (e) Conclusions. (f) Recommendations, if any. (6) A The office may reopen or reinvestigate a rights investigation may be reopened or reinvestigated by the office if there is new evidence that was not presented at the time of the initial investigation.